California statutes. Water Code
(c) Those constructed pursuant to the provisions of an act entitled “An act to promote the drainage of wet, swamp and overflowed lands, and to promote the public health in communities in which they lie,” approved March 21, 1903, as amended, and those which have been constructed pursuant to the provisions of the Drainage District Improvement Act of 1919, as amended, prior to January 1, 1937.

(d) Those within any city in such county whose legislative body has transferred and conveyed such drainage improvements to a flood control district, pursuant to Article 3 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

8156.

Any county within the limits of which there are drainage improvements within any of the classes mentioned in Section 8155 may, by a four-fifths vote of the members of the board of supervisors, transfer and convey all, but not less than all, of the drainage improvements in the county and within such classes to any flood control district in the county. The flood control district shall thereupon assume sole control and jurisdiction over such drainage improvements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

8157.

The flood control district to which such drainage improvements are transferred shall, upon acceptance of such transfer by four-fifths vote of the members of the governing body of the district, assume and provide for the operation, maintenance, and repair thereof, and thereupon be and become solely liable for the payment of the principal upon the bonds of any drainage improvement district, including bonds of districts secured by and payable out of a fund derived from specific or direct assessments which are a lien against particular parcels of land issued pursuant to the Drainage District Improvement Act of 1919, maturing subsequent to the date of such conveyance and transfer and for the payment of the interest upon the bonded debt of such drainage district represented by coupons maturing subsequent to the date of transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

8158.

From and after the date of transfer no tax shall be levied upon the lands within any such drainage district for the payment of the subsequently maturing principal and interest upon bonds of such district, except such levy as may be made by the flood control district. However, the lands within such drainage district or districts shall be and remain liable for the payment of all of the following:

(a) All previously maturing principal and interest.

(b) All levies of drainage district taxes theretofore levied.

(c) All installments of specific or direct assessments theretofore due or delinquent.

The proceeds of the collection of such drainage district taxes and assessments shall be applied solely and exclusively to the payment of the principal and interest for which they were levied, and the surplus, if any, of the proceeds of such collections shall be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of the interest and sinking fund of the flood control district and used solely and exclusively for the payment of principal and interest of the bonds of the flood control district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Transfers by Cities [8160. - 8164.]

8160.

Any city within the limits of which any drainage improvement has been constructed, and which drainage improvement also lies within the territorial limits of a flood control district, may, by four-fifths vote of the legislative body of the city, transfer and convey to the flood control district any drainage improvement; and, if drainage improvements have been conveyed to and accepted by a flood control district under the provisions of Article 2 of this chapter, such flood control district shall accept any drainage improvements conveyed to it by any city under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

8161.

Thereupon the flood control district shall assume and provide for the operation, maintenance, repair, and improvement of such drainage improvements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

8162.

From and after the date of transfer such flood control district is solely liable for the payment of the principal upon the general obligation bonds of any such drainage improvement district and upon bonds of such district secured by and payable out of a fund derived from specific or direct assessments which are a lien upon particular parcels of land, issued pursuant to the Improvement Bond Act of 1915, and for the payment of interest upon the bonded debt of any such drainage district represented by coupons maturing subsequent to the date of transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

8163.

From and after the date of transfer no tax shall be levied upon the lands within any such drainage district for the payment of the subsequently maturing principal and interest upon the bonds of such district, except such levy as may be made by the flood control district. However, the lands within such drainage distict or districts shall be and remain liable for the payment of all of the following:

(a) All previously maturing principal and interest.

(b) All levies of drainage district taxes theretofore levied.

(c) All installments of specific assessments securing such bonds which are payable or delinquent at the date of transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

8164.

The proceeds of the collection of such drainage district taxes and assessments shall be applied solely and exclusively to the payment of the principal and interest for which they were levied and the surplus, if any, of the proceeds of such collections shall be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of the interest and sinking fund of such flood control district and used solely and exclusively for the payment of principal and interest of the bonds of such flood control district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Cancellation and Refund of Assessments [8165. - 8165.]

8165.

The legislative body of the county or city which conducted the proceedings for the organization of such drainage improvement districts may do all of the following:

(a) Order the cancellation of any special assessment district tax levied upon property within such special assessment districts subsequent to the date of transfer and any unpaid installments of specific or direct assessments becoming due or delinquent subsequent to the date of transfer.

(b) Refund and adjust all payments made upon such installments becoming due or delinquent subsequent to the date of transfer.

(c) Cancel any and all installments of specific or direct assessments levied to retire bonds issued under the Improvement Bond Act of 1915, due or delinquent prior to the date of transfer in any case in which the principal and interest upon such bonds maturing prior to the date of transfer have been paid and the bonds so matured have been canceled and retired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Local Plans of Flood Protection [8200. - 8201.]

8200.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Local Flood Protection Planning Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 364, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8201.

(a) A local agency may prepare a local plan of flood protection in accordance with this chapter.

(b) A local plan of flood protection shall include all of the following:

(1) A strategy to meet the urban level of flood protection, including planning for residual flood risk, system resiliency, climate change, and rainwater and stormwater management.

(2) Identification of all types of flood hazards.

(3) Identification and risk assessment of the various facilities that provide flood protection for flood hazard areas, for current and future land uses.

(4) Identification of current and future flood corridors.

(5) Identification of needed improvements and costs of those improvements to the flood protection facilities that are necessary to meet flood protection standards.

(6) An
 emergency response and evacuation plan for flood-prone areas.

(7) A strategy to achieve multiple benefits, including flood protection, groundwater recharge, ecosystem health, and reduced maintenance costs over the long term.

(8) A long-term funding strategy for improvement and ongoing maintenance and operation of flood protection facilities.

(9) An update on the status of coordination with water suppliers on how the management of flood waters can bolster local water supplies.

(c) A local agency that is not a city or county that prepares a plan pursuant to this chapter shall consult with the cities and counties that have jurisdiction over the
 planning area to ensure that the local plan of flood protection is consistent with local general plans.

(d) Plans prepared pursuant to this chapter, within the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley as defined by Section 9602, shall be consistent with the Central Valley Flood Protection Plan pursuant to Section 9612.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 176, Sec. 1.   (AB 1811)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. STATE FLOOD CONTROL [8300. - 8457.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Powers of Department of Water Resources [8300. - 8307.]

8300.

The department may make examinations of lands subject to inundation and overflow by flood waters and of the waters causing the inundation or overflow and may make plans and estimates of the cost of works to regulate and control the flood waters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8301.

Whenever the law provides for any drainage or improving or rectifying river channels or other work on any river or slough flowing into San Francisco Bay, San Pablo Bay, and Suisun Bay, or on the tide waters flowing into said bays, the management and control of the work is in the department, if no other agency is specified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8302.

The department shall have charge of all expenditures unless otherwise provided by law for all public works relating to general river and harbor improvements, including reclamation and drainage of lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8303.

The department may purchase, construct and operate one or more dredges or any other needed appliances to promote or properly carry out the work of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8304.

The department may obtain or condemn any right-of-way necessary for any construction under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1239.)
-------------------------------------------

8306.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may provide meals and other necessary support to any person, including, but not limited to, an employee of the department, who is engaged in emergency flood fight activities on behalf of, or in cooperation with, the department.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “emergency flood fight activities” mean actions taken under emergency conditions to maintain flood control features, the failure of which threaten to destroy life, property, or resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 366, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.   See identical section added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

8306.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may provide meals and other necessary support to any person, including, but not limited to, an employee of the department, who is engaged in emergency flood fight activities on behalf of, or in cooperation with, the department.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “emergency flood fight activities” mean actions taken under emergency conditions to maintain flood control features, the failure of which threaten to destroy life, property, or resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8307.

(a) (1) A city or county may be required to contribute its fair and reasonable share of the property damage caused by a flood to the extent that the city or county has increased the state’s exposure to liability for property damage by unreasonably approving new development in a previously undeveloped area that is protected by a state flood control project.

(2) However, a city or county shall not be required to contribute if, after the amendments required by Sections 65302.9 and 65860.1 of the Government Code have become effective, the city or county complies with Sections 65865.5, 65962, and 66474.5 of the Government Code as applicable with respect to that development.
 This section shall not be construed to extend or toll the statute of limitations for challenging the approval of any new development.

(b) A city or county is not required to contribute unless an action has been filed against the state asserting liability for property damage caused by a flood and the provisions of subdivision (a) providing for contribution have been satisfied. A city or county is not required to contribute if the state settles the claims against it without providing the city or county with an opportunity to participate in settlement negotiations.

(c) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “State flood control project” means any flood control works within the Sacramento River Flood Control Project described
 in Section 8350, and of flood control projects in the Sacramento River and San Joaquin River watersheds authorized pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 12648) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 6.

(2) “Undeveloped area” means an area devoted to “agricultural use,” as defined in Section 51201 of the Government Code, or “open space land,” as defined in Section 65560 of the Government Code, that, as of January 1, 2008, is not already designated for development in a general or specific plan or by a local zoning ordinance.

(3) “Unreasonably approving” means approving a new development project without appropriately considering significant
 risks of flooding made known to the approving agency as of the time of approval and without taking reasonable and feasible action to mitigate the potential property damage to the new development resulting from a flood.

(4) “Feasible” means capable of being accomplished in a successful manner within a reasonable period of time, taking into account economic, environmental, legal, social, and technological factors.

(d) This section shall not apply to any land or projects for which an application for development has been submitted to the city or county prior to January 1, 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 777, Sec. 5.   (SB 639)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Cooperation in National Flood Insurance Program [8325. - 8326.]

8325.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) A large portion of the land resources of the state is subject to recurrent flooding causing loss of life and property, and there is a recognized public need in the state for flood insurance.

(b) The public interest will be served by state cooperation under a national flood insurance program, such as the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968 (Public Law 90-448; 82 Stat. 572).

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

8326.

For the purpose of providing state cooperation under a national flood insurance program, the department may:

(a) Cooperate with the United States in carrying out studies and investigations with respect to the adequacy of local measures in flood-prone areas as to land management and use, flood control, flood zoning, and flood damage prevention. 

(b) Review and comment upon applications of local public agencies to the United States for making flood insurance available in specific areas.

(c) Provide assistance to local public agencies by furnishing information on flood plains and in developing flood plain management plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Maintenance and Operation at Sacramento River Flood Control Project [8350. - 8371.]



  ARTICLE 1. Adoption of Federal Policy [8350. - 8350.]

8350.

The approval and adoption, by and on behalf of the State of California, of the conditions, plans, construction, and mode of maintenance and operation of works within the Sacramento River Flood Control Project, set forth in Senate Committee Print, Seventy-fifth Congress, First Session, as authorized and approved by Act of Congress, Public No. 392, Seventy-fifth Congress, approved August 26, 1937, including the holding and saving the United States from damages due to construction works, are continued in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties of Department of Water Resources [8360. - 8362.]

8360.

On behalf of the State the department has supervisory powers over the maintenance and operation of the flood control works of the Sacramento River Flood Control Project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8361.

The department shall maintain and operate on behalf of the state the following units or portions of the works of the Sacramento River Flood Control Project, and the cost of maintenance and operation shall be defrayed by the state:

(a) The east levee of the Sutter Bypass north of Nelson Slough.

(b) The levees and channels of the Wadsworth Canal, Willow Slough Channel downstream from the Southern Pacific Railroad from Davis to Woodland except that portion of the north levee thereof lying within Reclamation District No. 2035, Putah Creek downstream from Winters, the intercepting canals draining into them, and all structures incidental thereto.

(c) The collecting canals, sumps, pumps, and structures of the drainage system of Project No. 6 east of the Sutter Bypass.

(d) The bypass channels of the Butte Slough Bypass, the Sutter Bypass, the Tisdale Bypass, the Yolo Bypass, and the Sacramento Bypass with all cuts, canals, bridges, dams, and other structures and improvements contained therein and in the borrow pits thereof.

(e) The levees of the Sacramento Bypass.

(f) The channels and overflow channels of the Sacramento River and its tributaries and the major and minor tributaries’ flood control projects as authorized and defined in Sections 12648, 12648.1, and 12656.5.

(g) The Knights Landing ridge cut flowage area.

(h) The flood relief channels controlled by the Moulton and Colusa Weirs and the training levees thereof.

(i) The levee on the left bank of the Sacramento River adjoining Butte Basin, from the Butte Slough outfall gates upstream to a point four miles northerly from the Moulton Weir, after completion.

(j) All weirs and flood relief structures.

(k) The west levee of the Yolo Bypass, extending from the west end of the Fremont Weir southerly to the Cache Creek Settling Basin and from Willow Slough Channel to Putah Creek and the east levee of the Yolo Bypass from Fremont Weir southerly two miles.

(l) The levee on the west bank of Feather River extending a distance of about two miles southerly from the Sutter-Butte Canal headgate.

(m) The levees of Cache Creek and the easterly and westerly levees of Cache Creek Settling Basin; excepting the portion of the southerly levee of Cache Creek lying upstream from State Highway Route 7 (U.S. 99W).

(n) The flowage area of Western Pacific Intercepting Canal extending northerly for a distance of five miles from Bear River.

(o) The levees of Tisdale Bypass from Tisdale Weir 4.5 miles easterly to Sutter Bypass.

(p) The flood relief structures or weirs and other structures or facilities essential for their proper functioning in the vicinity of the Sacramento River between Big Chico Creek and the north boundary of Glenn County Levee District No. 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1090, Sec. 1.   Effective September 24, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

8362.

The department may contribute funds to the United States and expend funds appropriated or otherwise available to provide all lands, easements, and rights of way for bank revetment for the protection of levees above Cache Slough and the levee reconstruction, including the costs of all alterations to highways, road crossings, and drainage and irrigation facilities incident to the work and the State’s contribution of one-third of the costs of bank revetment and levee construction, as provided for and required under the provisions of the Act of Congress, Public No. 392, Seventy-fifth Congress, approved August 26, 1937.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Duties and Liabilities of Districts and Public Agencies [8370. - 8371.]

8370.

It is the responsibility, liability and duty of the reclamation districts, levee districts, protection districts, drainage districts, municipalities, and other public agencies within the Sacramento River Flood Control Project limits, to maintain and operate the works of the project within the boundaries or jurisdiction of such agencies, excepting only those works enumerated in Section 8361 and those for which provision for maintenance and operation is made by Federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8371.

The department shall, in connection with the flood control works of the Sacramento River Flood Control Project, make inspections and prepare reports which are required because of assurances given to the Secretary of the Army pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 8615) of Chapter 3 of Part 4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 185.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Cobey-Alquist Flood Plain Management Act [8400. - 8415.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration of Policy [8400. - 8401.]

8400.

This chapter may be cited as the Cobey-Alquist Flood Plain Management Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 506.)
-------------------------------------------

8401.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(a) A large portion of the state’s land resources is subject to recurrent flooding by overflow of streams and watercourses causing loss of life and property, disruption of commerce, and interruption of transportation and communications, all of which are detrimental to the health, safety, welfare, and property of the people of this state.

(b) The public interest necessitates sound development of land use, as land is a limited, valuable, and irreplaceable resource, and the flood plains of this state are a land resource to be developed in a manner which, in conjunction with economically justified structural measures for flood control, will result in (1) prevention of loss of life, and (2) prevention of economic loss caused by excessive flooding.

(c) The primary responsibility for planning, adoption, and enforcement of land use regulations to accomplish flood plain management rests with local levels of government.

(d) It is the policy of this state to encourage local levels of government to plan land use regulations to accomplish flood plain management and to provide state assistance and guidance therefor as appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 506.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [8402. - 8402.]

8402.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions apply throughout this chapter:

(a) “Department” means Department of Water Resources.

(b) “Board” means the State Reclamation Board.

(c) Wherever the words “department or board” or “department and board” are used together in this chapter they shall mean board as to any area within a project which by law is under the jurisdiction of the State Reclamation Board, and the department in all areas of the state outside these areas.

(d) “Public agency” means any city, city and county, county, or district organized, existing, and acting pursuant to the laws of this state.

(e) “Design flood” means the selected flood against which protection is provided, or eventually will be provided, by means of flood protective or control works. When a federal survey has been authorized the design flood will be determined by the appropriate federal agency and in all other cases it will be determined by the responsible local agency. It is the basis for design and operation of a particular project after full consideration of flood characteristics, frequencies, and potentials and economic and other practical considerations.

(f) “Designated floodway” means the channel of a stream and that portion of the adjoining flood plain required to reasonably provide for the construction of a project for passage of the design flood including the lands necessary for construction of project levees.

(g) “Restrictive zone” means the portion of the natural floodway between the limits of the designated floodway and the limits of the flood plain where inundation may occur but where depths and velocities are generally low.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 506.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Review of Flood Plain Management Plans [8403. - 8404.]

8403.

Prior to the establishment by a public agency of flood plain management regulations, the public agency may request and receive a review by the department or the board of the public agency’s flood plain management plans and shall furnish with the request necessary hydrologic studies, including flood routings or surveys adequate to properly delineate flood plain categories together with such additional supporting data as the department or the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 506.)
-------------------------------------------

8404.

Where adequate personnel are not available to a public agency to prepare the necessary flood routing or other engineering data needed for support of its flood plain management plans, the department or board may, upon request of the public agency, make or cause to be made the necessary investigation and provide the data to the requesting public agency for its use in developing such plans. The cost of such investigations shall be borne by the public agency making the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 506.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Establishment of Flood Plain Regulations [8410. - 8414.2.]

8410.

Flood plain regulations established to comply with requirements of Section 8411 shall meet the following criteria:

(a) Construction of structures in the designated floodway which may endanger life or significantly restrict the carrying capacity of the designated floodway shall be prohibited. For the purpose of this subdivision, the word “structures” does not include public utility electric, gas, or communication lines which may be located within the designated floodway; provided, that any permit or permits as may be required by law, other than this chapter, to so locate such lines have been granted.

(b) Developments shall be permitted within the restrictive zone in accordance with local agency policy, giving full consideration to the protection of human life and the carrying capacity of the flood plain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 506.)
-------------------------------------------

8410.5.

All public agencies shall comply with flood plain regulations established to meet the requirements of Section 8411. For the purposes of this section, “public agencies” includes the state or any department or agency thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 410.)
-------------------------------------------

8411.

Within any area classified “designated floodway” by the department or board after completion of a federal project report the appropriate public agency shall establish the necessary flood plain regulations within one year following notification by the department or board. The state shall not pay any of the cost of lands, easements, and rights-of-way associated with the flood control project as set forth in the project report of the federal agency unless flood plain regulations for the designated floodway are adopted in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1304, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8412.

The department or board shall review the adequacy of flood plain regulations established by a public agency to meet the requirements of Section 8411, and shall notify the appropriate public agency in the event the flood plain regulations are determined by the department or board to be inadequate to comply with the requirements of Section 8411. The department or board may recommend any provisions necessary to provide adequate flood plain regulations. Any such public agency shall within 180 days of receipt of the notice from the department or board, adopt new flood plain regulations. Upon their adoption a copy of such flood plain regulations shall be sent to the department or board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1304.)
-------------------------------------------

8413.

Flood plain regulations adopted pursuant to Section 8412 shall take effect 60 days from the date of adoption by the public agency and shall be deemed to meet the requirements of Section 8411 unless the department or board determines that such flood plain regulations are not adequate to comply with the requirements of Section 8411. If the department or board makes such a determination, it shall so report to the public agency and shall recommend such regulations or modifications of the regulations of the agency, which it determines are necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1304.)
-------------------------------------------

8414.

If a public agency fails to adopt flood plain regulations pursuant to Section 8411, or fails to adopt new flood plain regulations within 180 days of receipt of the department’s or board’s notice pursuant to Section 8412, or fails to adopt or modify such regulations in the manner determined as necessary by the department or board pursuant to Section 8413 within 90 days of receipt of the department’s or board’s notice pursuant to Section 8413, the local flood control agency having jurisdiction over the project area may adopt flood plain regulations for the designated floodway necessary to comply with the requirements of Section 8411. Such flood plain regulations adopted by the local flood control agency shall take effect 30 days from the date of their adoption and shall be enforced by the public agency and have the same force and effect as if adopted as flood plain regulations by the public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1304.)
-------------------------------------------

8414.2.

No public agency shall revise flood plain regulations established to meet the requirements of Section 8411 or shall grant a variance from such regulations without the consent of the department or board and of the local flood control agency having jurisdiction over the project area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1304.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Administrative Regulations [8415. - 8415.]

8415.

The department and the board, within their respective jurisdictions as provided in this chapter, shall establish general policy and may prescribe such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 506.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Maintenance Costs of Vegetation on Levees [8450. - 8457.]

8450.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) Although the levees of flood control projects in this state have in the past been considered to be single-purpose, flood control features, many of these projects receive heavy nonlocal usage for recreation, transportation, and other purposes for which the retention and maintenance of vegetative cover is desirable.

(b) Construction and maintenance practices have been developed over the past several decades which were designed to minimize costs while still furnishing the required degree of flood control. These practices in many instances resulted in “bare” levees, devoid of any vegetative cover which might interfere with local maintenance, levee inspection, or flood fighting.

(c) Flood control project levees are increasingly recognized as valuable wildlife, recreational, scenic, and aesthetic resources, and construction and maintenance standards have been developed by the Army Corps of Engineers and the State of California which minimize vegetation removal and which encourage or require, as a condition of the project work, replanting and controlled vegetation maintenance on such levees as part of the responsibility of local flood control districts.

(d) Costs of maintaining vegetation on levees for such non-flood-control purposes as wildlife enhancement, recreation, and scenic beauty are approximately double those of normal flood-control-related maintenance, and nonlocal users are the prime beneficiaries. It is therefore appropriate that the general public participate in meeting such additional maintenance costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 995.)
-------------------------------------------

8451.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in providing for state participation in the additional costs attributable to the non-flood-control activities described in this chapter, that the Reclamation Board and the Department of Water Resources, in preparing rules and regulations to implement this chapter, provide that, in processing applications from flood control districts for state participation in such costs, highest priority be given to those districts in which factors, such as the size of the district, degree of nonlocal benefits, and level of non-flood-control maintenance costs which have been transferred to the district due to circumstances beyond their control, combine to work financial hardship on such districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 995.)
-------------------------------------------

8452.

Wherever the words “department or the Reclamation Board” are used together in this chapter, they shall mean the Reclamation Board as to any flood control project levees under its jurisdiction and the Department of Water Resources as to all other flood control project levees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 995.)
-------------------------------------------

8453.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, it is the intention of the Legislature that the state shall pay 50 percent of the costs associated with the operation and maintenance of project facilities under the State Water Resources Law of 1945 which are directly attributable to the planting or retention of controlled vegetative cover for wildlife, recreational, scenic, and aesthetic purposes on project levees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 995.)
-------------------------------------------

8454.

Local agencies maintaining project facilities under the State Water Resources Law of 1945 shall be eligible for reimbursement pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if the cost of maintenance is increased by the planting or retention of vegetative cover on such levees, if the local agency agrees to maintain such vegetative cover on project levees as may be determined by the department or Reclamation Board, after consultation with any other affected state agencies, to be necessary for wildlife habitat, recreational, aesthetic, and scenic purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 995.)
-------------------------------------------

8455.

Local agencies entering into agreements with the state shall annually prepare a work program and estimate of cost for conducting any maintenance activities necessary to carry out the project maintenance and the purposes of this chapter and shall submit the proposed program and cost estimates to the department or the Reclamation Board for review. The department or the Reclamation Board shall review the proposed program and, after receiving the comments of any other affected state agencies, the department or the Reclamation Board shall certify for reimbursement 50 percent of those costs which are found to be attributable to the maintenance of vegetative cover for wildlife, recreational, aesthetic, and scenic purposes, and may allocate funds appropriated for these purposes to local agencies which have entered into agreements with the state pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 995.)
-------------------------------------------

8456.

Administrative costs incurred by the department or the Reclamation Board under this chapter in any fiscal year shall not exceed 10 percent of the annual cost of the program established by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 995.)
-------------------------------------------

8457.

State expenditures for the purposes of this chapter shall not exceed the amount of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) per year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 995.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. SACRAMENTO AND SAN JOAQUIN DRAINAGE DISTRICT [8500. - 8504.]



  CHAPTER 1. Creation and Boundaries [8500. - 8504.]

8500.

The “Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District” is continued in existence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8501.

The boundaries of the district are set forth and described in Chapter 170, Statutes and Amendments to the Codes, California, 1913, and the description is hereby incorporated herein by reference as there set out.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8502.

The management and control of the district are vested in the Central Valley Flood Protection Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8503.

The district is a body corporate and politic and may sue and be sued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8504.

The district may acquire, own, hold, use, and enjoy any and all properties necessary for the purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.5. Yolo Bypass Cache Slough Partnership Multibenefit Program [8510. - 8512.]

8510.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Yolo Bypass is a 59,000-acre flood control facility located in the Counties of Yolo and Solano that absorbs excess flood waters from the Sacramento River and conveys the waters 40 miles south into the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta.

(b) Authorized by Congress in 1917 and built by the United States Army Corps of Engineers in the 1920s, the Yolo Bypass provides critical flood protection to over 650,000 people, several small communities, important agricultural land, and over sixty billion dollars ($60,000,000,000) in public and private assets.
